Hawaii statutes.
[§136-6] Penalties. (a) Any violation
of section 136-2 is punishable by a fine of not less than $100 and not more
than $500 or imprisonment for a definite term to be fixed by the court not to
exceed thirty days, or both.

(b) Any violation of section 136-3 or 136-4 is
punishable by a fine of not less than $100 and not more than $500. [L 1999, c
94, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next